S.  HRG.  109–309

NOMINATIONS  OF  SHANA  LEIGH  DALE  TO  BE 
DEPUTY  ADMINISTRATOR  OF  NASA;  KATHRYN 
O’LEARY  HIGGINS  AND  MARK  V.  ROSENKER 
TO 
THE  NATIONAL
TRANSPORTATION  SAFETY  BOARD

BE  MEMBERS  OF 

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

NOVEMBER  1,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

26–233 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on November 1, 2005 ........................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Letters  from  Hon.  Barbara  A.  Mikulski  and  Hon.  Hillary  Rodham

Page 
1
5
2
2

Clinton, supporting Kathryn O’Leary Higgins................................................. 4,5
27
1

Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Dale, Shana Leigh, Nominee to be Deputy Administrator of NASA ...................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Biographical information .................................................................................
Levin, Hon. Sander M., U.S. Representative from Michigan ...............................
Higgins,  Kathryn  O’Leary,  Nominee  to  be  a  Member  of  the  National  Trans-
portation Safety Board ........................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Biographical information .................................................................................
Rosenker,  Mark  V.,  Nominee  to  be  a  Member  of  the  National  Transportation 
Safety Board .........................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Biographical information .................................................................................
Sarbanes, Hon. Paul S., U.S. Senator from Maryland .........................................

Nelson, Hon. Bill, U.S. Senator from Florida, prepared statement .....................
Hall, Hon. Ralph M., U.S. Representative from Texas, prepared statement .....

APPENDIX 

19
20
22
4

7
8
9

12
13
14
3

31
31

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

ADMINISTRATOR 

NOMINATIONS  OF  SHANA  LEIGH  DALE  TO  BE 
DEPUTY 
NASA;
KATHRYN  O’LEARY  HIGGINS  AND  MARK  V. 
ROSENKER  TO  BE  MEMBERS  OF  THE
NATIONAL 
SAFETY 
BOARD 

TRANSPORTATION 

OF 

TUESDAY,  NOVEMBER  1,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.  in  room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Our apologies. It seems the two of us got lost try-

ing to find this room. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  This  morning  the  Committee  will  hear  from 
nominees  for  positions  at  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Ad-
ministration and the National Transportation Safety Board. 

For  decades,  our  Nation’s  space  program  has  focused  on  Space 
Shuttle operations. Recently the President gave us a new Vision for 
Space  Exploration  which  will  take  our  country  back  to  the  moon 
and  eventually  to  Mars.  Fulfilling  this  vision  will  pose  many  tech-
nological  and  budgetary  challenges.  The  team  which  Dr.  Griffin  is 
assembling  will  take  our  first  steps  toward  attempting  to  achieve 
this vision. 

Ms.  Dale,  Dr.  Griffin  and  I  have  spoken  about  your  nomination. 
I look forward to hearing from you. Specifically, I am interested in 
how  you  see  yourself  fitting  in  to  the  NASA  hierarchy  and  what 
you  think  will  be  some  of  the  major  contributions  you  may  make 
to that agency. 

Since 1967, the National Transportation Safety Board has inves-
tigated  all  civil  aviation  accidents  and  major  accidents  in  other 
transportation  modes.  It  also  consults  with  investigators  in  other 
countries  on  major  transportation  accidents  outside  the  United 
States.  The  NTSB  employs  more  than  400  people  at  various  loca-
tions.  It  has  headquarters  in  Washington,  D.C.,  10  regional  offices 
throughout the country, and a training academy near Leesburg. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

The  Department  of  Transportation’s  Inspector  General  has  over-
sight responsibilities over the NTSB. In 2004, the IG identified in-
formation security as a material weakness at the agency and made 
a number of recommendations. 

Last month, the IG completed a second audit. The IG found that 
beyond hiring a Chief Information Officer, the agency had made lit-
tle  progress  toward  increasing  its  information  security.  IG  inves-
tigators  were  able  to  crack  the  Internet  passwords  that  control  ac-
cess  to  the  NTSB  network.  Further,  investigators  were  able  to  ac-
cess  sensitive  information,  including  real-time  conversations  be-
tween pilots and controllers during an accident. This is far from an 
acceptable  level  of  security,  and  we  look  forward  to  hearing  the 
nominee’s views on this issue. 

Mark Rosenker is currently the acting Chairman of the National 
Transportation  Safety  Board.  He  is  also  Vice  Chairman,  a  position 
nominated by the President but not requiring Senate confirmation. 
He is before the Committee today for his renomination as an NTSB 
member for a 5-year term. He has been nominated to a Republican 
seat. 

Kitty Higgins is a former Senate staffer who went on to work in 
the  Clinton  Administration  and  at  the  National  Trust  for  Historic 
Preservation. 

We  look  forward  to  having  both  of  you  before  the  Committee 

I will turn to Senator Inouye for comments before we turn to our 

today. 

colleagues. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Sensing all the nominees are eager to get to work, I ask that my 

statement be made part of the record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
For nearly 40 years, the NTSB’s dogged investigations of transportation accidents 
have  improved  the  safety  of  America’s  transportation  system,  and  its  work,  though 
often  unnoticed,  has  helped  millions  of  travelers  arrive  safely  at  their  destinations 
every  day.  The  NTSB  and  its  staff  are  widely  recognized  for  their  unparalleled  at-
tention to detail and impartiality. 

For  the  NTSB  to  be  effective,  its  Members  must  be  above  politics.  Congress  de-
pends on the Board to work cooperatively and to build upon its proven track record. 
The  Board  must  continue  to  improve  transportation  safety  based  on  both  the  evi-
dence that it receives and the tireless work of its dedicated experts. 

We  look  forward  to  learning  more  about  Mr.  Rosenker  and  Ms.  Higgins,  their 

qualifications, their thoughts on the NTSB’s future, and the role they will play. 

We  also  have  with  us,  Ms.  Shana  Dale,  who  has  been  nominated  to  be  Deputy 
Administrator  at  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  The 
Committee has great confidence in Administrator Michael Griffin, and he has made 
it clear that he wants you at NASA as soon as possible. 

You  will  be  entering  NASA  at  a  challenging  time.  The  agency  is  trying  to  keep 
flying and live up to its current commitments while building a new vehicle and be-
ginning a new program of lunar exploration. Managing the transition from the cur-
rent program to NASA’s future will require the agency to make smart choices about 
using resources and technology. 

When  resources  get  tight,  I  hope  that  you  will  not  cut  to  the  bone,  particularly 

in science, education, and aeronautics.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

The CHAIRMAN. I am sorry to have delayed our colleagues. 
We  should  turn  to  Senator  Sarbanes  to  introduce  the  person  he 

wishes to speak about. 

STATEMENT OF HON. PAUL S. SARBANES,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MARYLAND 

Senator  SARBANES.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Ste-
vens  and  Senator  Inouye.  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  before  the  Com-
mittee. 

You  have  got  a  terrific  nominee  here  before  the  Committee  this 
morning  in  Kitty  Higgins.  I  have  known  Kitty  a  long  time.  She  is 
a resident of Annapolis in my state. We are very proud to have her 
as a resident. 

The  Members  of  this  Committee,  of  course,  know  well  the  very 
significant  work  of  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board.  It  is 
really critical to the safety and the well-being of the American trav-
eling public. They provide independent federal oversight for all civil 
aviation  accidents  in  the  U.S.,  as  well  as  investigatory  responsi-
bility  for  significant  tragedies  on  our  waterways,  railroads,  and 
highways. So it is very significant work. 

Kitty  Higgins  brings  very  significant  qualifications  for  this  posi-
tion. Out of the University of Nebraska, she worked in the Depart-
ment  of  Labor.  She  then  was  on  the  White  House  Domestic  Policy 
Council during the Carter Administration as Assistant Director for 
Employment Policy. She then went to work on Capitol Hill, includ-
ing 4 years as the minority staff director on the Labor and Human 
Resources  Committee,  and  then  went  over  to  the  House  side  and 
served  as  Chief  of  Staff  for  7  years  for  Congressman  Sandy  Levin 
who,  Mr.  Chairman,  is  here  with  us  this  morning.  You  may  want 
to have a reference from him as well. 

She  joined  the  Clinton  Administration  in  1993  as  Chief  of  Staff 
to  the  Secretary  of  Labor.  She  left  the  Labor  Department  in  1995, 
became Assistant to the President and Secretary to the Cabinet. As 
Cabinet  Secretary,  she  was  the  key  administrative  official  in  the 
coordination of the response to a number of important natural and 
national  disasters,  including  the  ValuJet  and  the  TWA  flight  800 
crashes. So she has dealt extensively in that position with the Na-
tional  Transportation  Safety  Board  and  the  Federal  Aviation  Ad-
ministration and knows intimately their work. 

In  March  1997,  she  was  nominated  to  be  Deputy  Secretary  of 
Labor,  unanimously  confirmed  by  the  Senate  in  that  post.  So  she 
was at the Labor Department as the Chief Operating Officer of the 
Department beginning in 1997. 

She has also served as Vice Chair of the Presidential Council on 
the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Roles  and  Missions,  and  when  she  left  the 
Federal  Government,  she  was  at  the  National  Trust  for  Historic 
Preservation for 5 years. 

She  is  an  enormously  accomplished,  skilled,  knowledgeable,  and 
effective  government  servant.  She  has  carried  out  very  significant 
responsibilities  in  her  various  positions  over  the  course  of  her  ca-
reer.  And  I  have  every  confidence  she  will  do  an  absolutely  out-
standing  job  as  a  member  of  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board, and I commend her very strongly to the Committee. 

The CHAIRMAN. A very substantial recommendation, Senator. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

words. 

4

Congressman  Levin,  did  you  wish  to  have  a  comment  at  this 

time? 

STATEMENT OF HON. SANDER M. LEVIN,
U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM MICHIGAN 

Mr.  LEVIN.  Senators,  I  appreciate  the  chance  to  say  just  a  few 

I came over here basically to sit and kind of revel in this nomina-
tion.  There  is  no  one  I  have  met  who  has  more  integrity,  who  has 
more  public  interest.  She  has,  I  think,  unusual  experience  in  both 
the executive and the legislative branches of our government. 

She  also,  from  her  early  years,  as  I  have  been  told—and  I  saw 
it firsthand when she worked in the House—has a deep sensitivity 
to  the  public  and  for  the  individual’s  interest.  That  really  is  what 
safety  is  all  about,  its  impact  on  us  as  individuals.  She  has  also 
had experience through her work with the White House in matters 
relating to safety. 

So I just wanted to come here and join Senator Sarbanes in say-
ing to you that I think this is a superb nomination, and Kitty Hig-
gins,  as  she  has  always  done  in  the  past,  will  completely  live  up 
to the trust, in this case, of the U.S. Senate. 

Thank you so much, Senator. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  Sandy,  it  is  nice  to  have  you  over  here  to 

see where your brother lives. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. LEVIN. I have heard rumors. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Inouye. 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I have two letters, one from Senator Barbara Mikulski, the other 
from Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton, supporting Kathryn O’Leary 
Higgins for this position. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  They  will  be  placed  in  the  record,  without  objec-

tion. 

[The letters of Senator Mikulski and Senator Clinton follow:]
BARBARA A. MIKULSKI, UNITED STATES SENATE 

Washington, DC, November 1, 2005

Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Senator Inouye:

I  am  writing  to  support  Kathryn  O’Leary  Higgins’  appointment  to  the  National 

Transportation Safety Board (NTSB). 

The  mission  of  the  NTSB  is  to  investigate  every  civil  aviation  accident  in  the 
United  States—as  well  as  significant  accidents  in  other  modes  of  transportation. 
The  NTSB  is  also  charged  with  issuing  safety  recommendations  to  prevent  future 
accidents. Kitty Higgins’ extraordinary experience and analytical abilities make her 
well suited for this critical position. 

Ms. Higgins has a wide range of experience in both the Executive and the Legisla-
tive  branches  of  government.  As  President  Clinton’s  Cabinet  Secretary,  she  worked 
closely  with  the  NTSB  and  the  Department  of  Transportation.  As  liaison  to  both 
agencies,  she  worked  with  the  FAA  on  safety  inspector  staffing  and  surveillance—
which  are  both  critical  components  of  aviation  accident  investigations.  She  also 
worked  with  the  FAA  and  Congress  to  increase  inspector  staffing  in  the  aftermath 
of  the  ValuJet  and  TWA  800  accidents.  She  played  a  key  role  in  coordinating  the 
federal agencies that investigated the accidents. In addition, she worked to improve 
communication and assistance to families of the victims. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

Ms.  Higgins  has  also  worked  closely  with  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard.  She  co-chaired 
the  Coast  Guard  Roles  and  Missions  Commission.  Currently,  she  serves  as  a  mem-
ber  of  the  Navigation  Council  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deep  Water  Procurement 
Project. 

Kitty  Higgins  has  had  a  remarkable  career  in  government  service.  As  a  Member 
of  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board,  she  would  continue  her  work  to  im-
prove  the  safety  of  our  nation’s  transportation  systems.  I  enthusiastically  support 
her appointment. 

Sincerely, 

BARBARA A. MIKULSKI, 

U.S. Senator. 

HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON, UNITED STATES SENATE 

Washington, DC, October 31, 2005

Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Dan:

I write in strong support of the nomination of Kathryn ‘‘Kitty’’ Higgins to the Na-

tional Transportation Safety Board. 

I  have  known  Kitty  Higgins  for  12  years.  She  has  over  30  years  of  experience  in 
both the public and private sectors and served as Secretary to the President’s Cabi-
net  during  the  Clinton  Administration.  At  that  time,  she  worked  closely  with  the 
NTSB  on  the  1996  ValuJet  and  TWA  800  accident  investigations.  She  understands 
how  important  it  is  to  protect  the  Board’s  independence  while  insuring  that  all  the 
relevant federal, state and local agencies are consulted and participate. She worked 
closely  with  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  on  a  number  of  issues  including 
reform  legislation  enacted  by  the  Committee.  She  also  had  the  opportunity  to  work 
with the Coast Guard and served as Vice Chair of the Coast Guard Roles and Mis-
sions  Commission  that  made  recommendations  to  the  President.  Kitty  currently 
serves  as  a  Member  of  the  Navigation  Council  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater 
Project.  She  also  has  a  wealth  of  experience  working  on  labor  and  employment 
issues  which  gives  her  a  particular  understanding  of  the  needs  of  workers  and  the 
importance of technical and safety training. 

Kitty  Higgins  is  eminently  qualified  to  serve  on  the  National  Transportation  and 
Safety  Board.  She  has  a  strong  record  of  bi-partisanship,  a  wealth  of  experience 
with  complex  issues,  and  the  ability  to  work  with  people  of  diverse  views.  In  addi-
tion  to  her  professional  qualifications,  she  is  one  of  the  finest  individuals  I  have 
known  and  devotes  much  of  her  time  and  energy  to  her  church  and  many  worth-
while causes. I urge you to confirm her nomination. 

Sincerely yours, 

HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON, 

U.S. Senator.

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  will  turn  to  the  introduction  of  the  nominee 

Senator Allen supports. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator  Inouye, 
Senator Pryor. Thank you for allowing me to introduce and present 
to the Committee——

The CHAIRMAN. Pardon me. Did you have any comment, Senator 

Senator PRYOR. I do not. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Go ahead. 
Senator  ALLEN.  It  sounds  like  Ms.  Higgins,  by  the  way,  Mr. 
Chairman,  has  plenty  of  glowing  accolades.  Let  me  present  Mr. 
Mark Rosenker, now a resident of Virginia, to the Committee. 

Pryor? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

I  also  want  to  say  to  Ms.  Dale,  living  a  lot  of  places  around  the 
country, thank you also for choosing Virginia as your place of resi-
dence as well. 

Let me focus on Mr. Rosenker, though. He has impressive quali-
fications, and I know you have it as part of the record for this nom-
ination. Since his confirmation more than 21⁄2 and a half years ago, 
Mark Rosenker has demonstrated himself to be a qualified and en-
ergized member of this important federal agency. 

At  this  point  I  believe  his  wife  Heather  is  right  behind  him. 
Heather,  thank  you  for  being  here.  I  suspect  during  your  com-
ments, the Chairman will ask you to introduce your bride and any 
other colleagues or friends who are here who have come to support 
your nomination. 

During his tenure, Mr. Chairman, Mark has brought a wealth of 
management  and  advocacy  experience  to  the  board.  With  more 
than  36  years  of  active  and  reserve  duty  in  the  Air  Force,  having 
risen  to  the  rank  of  major  general,  Mark’s  decorations  include  the 
Distinguished  Service  Medal,  Legion  of  Merit  and  two  Meritorious 
Service Medals, which is outstanding for somebody to be serving on 
the National Transportation Safety Board. 

I  think  because  of  his  unique  combination  of  private  sector  and 
military  experience,  President  Bush  appointed  Mark  to  be  Deputy 
Assistant  to  the  President  and  Director  of  the  White  House  Mili-
tary Office. After serving for 2 years in that White House position, 
President Bush nominated Mark to serve in his current position at 
the  NTSB.  Since  he  was  confirmed  in  March  of  2003,  President 
Bush has twice designated Mark to serve in the role of Vice Chair-
man,  and  since  March  of  this  year,  Mark  has  been  serving  with 
distinction as Acting Chairman of the NTSB. 

During this time on the board, Mark has been a strong and out-
spoken  advocate  for  transportation  safety.  For  his  leadership  role 
and  in  a  variety  of  ways,  but  particularly  in  recreational  boating 
issues,  the  National  Safe  Boating  Council  presented  their  highest 
honor, the Confluence Award, to him. This is traditionally given to 
Members  of  Congress,  and  Mark  Rosenker  is  one  of  the  very  few 
executive branch people to receive this award. 

The  aviation  industry  also  acknowledges  his  leadership  role  in 
the challenging issue of preventing runway incursions. He has been 
outspoken in attempting to get the FAA to require that all children 
under  the  age  of  2  be  secured  in  safety  belts  while  flying.  I  think 
all  the  passengers  would  like  that,  and  so  long  as  they  are  loose 
enough that the kids can lay over, if they are asleep and quiet, that 
probably would be fine as well as a parent. 

Mark  is  now  a  resident  of  Virginia.  He  spent  a  good  deal  of  his 
youth in Maryland. Senator Sarbanes should know all this. He has 
gotten all these awards from the University of Maryland. I am not 
going to hold that against him. I am still for him. He was honored 
to  be  their  commencement  speaker.  He  was  presented  with  their 
2001 Distinguished Centennial Graduate Award, which is quite an 
honor. 

Clearly,  Mark  Rosenker,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Committee,  has  demonstrated  that  he  is  capable  and  enthusiastic 
about  the  Board  and  its  mission,  and  I  respectfully  urge  my  col-
leagues to swiftly support his reconfirmation. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our other nominee before us today is Ms. Dale. We have a letter 
of  support  here  for  Ms.  Shana  Dale  from  Representative  Ralph 
Hall, and I had several personal phone calls from the administrator 
saying  why  had  you  not  been  the  subject  of  hearings.  So  tell  Mike 
we got to it right after we got his call. OK? 

Any further comments, Senator? 
Very well. Let us turn first then to Ms. Higgins. Ms. Higgins, you 
obviously  have  the  support  of  all  of  the  Irish  mafia  around  here 
today. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  But  tell  us  a  little  bit  about  what  you  see  for 

yourself in terms of this assignment. What are your priorities? 
STATEMENT OF KATHRYN O’LEARY HIGGINS, NOMINEE TO BE 
A  MEMBER  OF  THE  NATIONAL  TRANSPORTATION  SAFETY 
BOARD 
Ms. HIGGINS. Thank you, Senator. 
May  I  just  introduce  my  daughter-in-law,  Kate  Higgins,  who  is 
here, representing all the Higgins and O’Learys today? And my son 
Kevan  is  at  our  embassy  in  Port-au–Prince,  Haiti  and  I  think  is 
watching via the webcast there. 

As  Senator  Sarbanes  and  Congressman  Levin  said,  I  worked  on 
these  issues  first  when  I  was  at  the  White  House  about  10  years 
ago.  I  gained  enormous  respect  for  the  NTSB,  the  work  that  they 
do,  the  mission  of  the  agency,  and  the  career  staff  there,  and  look 
forward to joining them, if I am confirmed by the Senate. 

Senator I would say in my experience with the Board and looking 
at some of the current issues, I think there are a number of things 
that are of concern. I think budget resources, staffing resources are 
an  important  issue.  I  think  the  IG  report  that  has  already  been 
mentioned raises some very troubling issues, and I know that is of 
concern  to  the  Committee.  I  know  it  is  a  focus  of  the  Vice  Chair-
man  and  will  be,  obviously,  an  important  concern  to  those  of  us 
who hope to serve on the Board. 

There are some other areas that are of interest, for example, the 
nexus  between  safety  and  security.  TWA  800  was  a  protracted  in-
vestigation  because  it  raised  the  issue  of  security.  It  proved  to  be 
an accident, but obviously security has come to the forefront in the 
last  few  years,  and  I  am  interested  in  making  sure  that  the  focus 
on  safety  for  all  modes  of  transportation  is  not  being  jeopardized 
by the increased focus on national security. Both are important pri-
orities.  We  just  have  to  make  sure  that  safety  continues  to  have 
priority, along with security. 

I  think  there  is  a  concern  that  we  all  share  about  the  number 
of  recent  accidents  in  foreign  countries  on  foreign  carriers.  The 
Board  gets  involved  in  investigating  those  accidents.  Our  safety 
record  in  aviation  here  has  been  pretty  good  the  last  couple  of 
years, but there are an increasing number of fatal accidents occur-
ring  abroad.  I  would  like  to  know  more  about  that.  What  are  the 
implications  for  the  safety  of  American  travelers  who  fly  on  those 
carriers? 

I  looked  at  the  RAND  Corporation  report,  which  was  issued  a 
number  of  years  ago.  It  made  a  number  of  very  important  rec-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

ommendations, particularly in the aviation area, about the work of 
the  Board,  the  needs  of  the  staff.  My  understanding  is  that  those 
recommendations  really  have  not  been  addressed.  I  would  hope,  if 
confirmed,  to  go  back  to  that  report  and  begin  to  ask  some  ques-
tions about which of those recommendations should get more atten-
tion. The report looked into the future and said, aviation is getting 
much more complex. The resources at the Board have not increased 
proportionately.  The  technology  is  increasing.  We  need  to  make 
sure  that  there  is  the  training  and  other  kinds  of  things  that  the 
staff there need to get the job done. 

[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Ms. 

Higgins follow:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KATHRYN O’LEARY HIGGINS, NOMINEE TO BE A MEMBER 

OF THE NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, 
I welcome the opportunity to appear before you to today as you consider my nomi-
nation to serve as a Member of the National Transportation Safety Board. I am hon-
ored  to  have  been  selected  by  Senator  Reid  and  nominated  by  President  Bush  for 
this  important  position.  If  confirmed,  I  commit  to  you  that  I  will  dedicate  myself 
to  helping  ensure  that  the  NTSB  meets  its  vital  safety  obligations  to  the  traveling 
public. 

I believe my over 30 years of experience in the legislative and executive branches, 
as  well  as  in  the  private  sector,  have  provided  me  with  the  managerial,  leadership 
and teamwork skills necessary to succeed in the position for which I have been nom-
inated.  Further,  I  believe  my  varied  experience  has  given  me  a  good  perspective 
both on how organizations work and how to get things accomplished. 

During  my  tenure  as  Cabinet  Secretary  in  the  Clinton  Administration,  I  had  the 
chance to work firsthand both with the NTSB and the Federal Aviation Administra-
tion.  Following  the  ValuJet  accident  in  1996,  I  was  in  continuous  contact  with  key 
NTSB  officials  as  they  proceeded  with  the  accident  investigation  and  issued  emer-
gency recommendations to the FAA to address the problems they uncovered. Subse-
quently,  the  TWA  800  tragedy  occurred  and  serious  questions  existed  regarding 
whether  it  was  a  terrorist  act,  leading  to  intensive  investigations  by  the  FBI  and 
the  NTSB.  I  served  as  the  focal  point  within  the  White  House  for  tracking  these 
investigative  efforts.  As  such,  for  a  period  of  months,  I  was  in  close  contact  with 
these agencies as the investigation proceeded, and made several on-site visits to the 
hangar in New York where the destroyed aircraft was being reconstructed as pieces 
were  recovered.  On  one  of  these  trips  I  accompanied  President  Clinton  as  he  met 
with  investigators  and  consoled  family  members.  From  this  work,  I  was  able  to 
learn  firsthand  about  the  Board’s  investigative  processes.  I  also  developed  a  deep 
respect for the commitment and competence of the hard-working professionals at the 
NTSB. 

As  Cabinet  Secretary,  I  also  had  the  opportunity  to  work  closely  with  FAA  offi-
cials  on  a  variety  of  matters  that  gave  me  an  appreciation  for  the  types  of  aviation 
issues  and  challenges  faced  on  an  on-going  basis  by  the  FAA.  For  example,  I  was 
a primary White House contact for FAA and DOT executives as the 1996 FAA reau-
thorization and reform bill was being formulated by this Committee. 

I  have  also  had  the  opportunity  and  privilege  to  work  with  the  Coast  Guard.  At 
the  request  of  Commandant  James  Loy,  I  served  as  Vice-Chair  of  the  Coast  Guard 
Roles  and  Missions  Commission.  I  currently  serve  as  a  Member  of  the  Navigation 
Council for the Coast Guard’s Deepwater Procurement Project. I believe this experi-
ence  has  given  me  a  good  sense  of  the  work  the  Coast  Guard  does  and  would  pro-
vide me with a good basis to work cooperatively with the agency on maritime inves-
tigations of mutual concern to the Coast Guard and the Board. 

Finally, my 30 years of work as an advocate and author of policies to help Amer-
ican  workers  gives  me  a  special  and  important  perspective  for  this  post.  I  under-
stand the importance of training workers to enhance technical skills, promote safety 
and prevent accidents. I pledge to pay particular attention to issues affecting work-
ers if confirmed as a Member of the Board. 

If  confirmed,  I  hope  to  contribute  to  maintaining—and  even  enhancing—the 
Board’s status as the preeminent accident investigation body in the world. I believe 
this  is  an  important  priority.  Although  it  is  my  sense  that  the  Board  does  a  very 
good job on a day-to-day basis in its investigative efforts, I am interested in learning 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

if there are ways to expedite the process of completing accident reports and issuing 
recommendations  to  affected  transportation  modes.  I  also  am  hopeful  there  are 
means  of  working  with  other  agencies  to  achieve  the  more  timely  adoption  of  rec-
ommendations.  Although  the  vast  majority  of  Board  recommendations  are  adopted 
and  implemented,  it  sometimes  takes  a  protracted  period  before  the  recommended 
action  items  reach  fruition.  In  my  view,  safety  will  be  enhanced  if  thoughtful,  bal-
anced  recommendations  are  issued,  adopted  and  implemented  on  a  timely  basis. 
This  is  an  area  where  I  would  plan  to  focus,  if  confirmed  to  serve  on  the  NTSB. 
In  closing,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  reiterate  my  commitment  to  devote  my  efforts 
to  working  as  hard  as  I  can  to  benefit  the  safety  of  the  traveling  public  if  I  am  af-
forded the honor and opportunity of serving on the Board. I would be pleased to re-
spond  to  any  questions  you  or  Members  of  the  Committee  may  have  at  this  time. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 
1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used):

Kathryn O’Leary Higgins. 
Kitty Higgins. 
Kathryn O’Leary. 
Kitty O’Leary.

2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Member,  National  Transportation  Safety  Board 

(Democratic Seat). 

3. Date of Nomination: 7/27/05. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses):

Residence: information not released to the public. 
Office: None.

5. Date and Place of Birth: 10/11/47, Sioux City Iowa. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage).
Spouse is deceased. 
Liam Higgins—31. 
Kevan Higgins—27.

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended.

Mount Marty College 1965–1967 (no degree: transferred). 
University of Nebraska 1967–1969 (BS, Social Science and Education).

8.  List  all  management-level  jobs  held  and  any  non-managerial  jobs  that  relate 

to the position for which you are nominated.

President, TATC Consulting. 
Vice President for Public Policy, National Trust for Historic Preservation. 
Deputy Secretary of Labor. 
Assistant to the President, and Cabinet Secretary. 
COS, Secretary of Labor. 
COS, Congressman Sander Levin. 
Democratic Staff Director, Senate Labor and Human Resources Committee.

9. List any advisory, consultative, honorary or other part-time service or positions 
with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, within the 
last five years. 

Member, Navigation Council, Coast Guard Deep Water Project. 
10.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  five 
years. 

Board Member, University of Maryland School of Public Affairs. 
11.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  ten  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap.

Project Children/Washington Intern Program (1999 to present). 
Bridges to Peace Board (1999 to present). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

Video Action Board (2003 to present). 
Charles Carroll House of Annapolis, Vice Chair (1999 to present). 
Historic London Town Board (2000 to present). 
International Cabinet of the Baltimore Basilica (2000 to present). 
Ignatian Lay Volunteer Corps, Vice Chair (2001 to present). 
Sherwood Forest Club in Annapolis, Md.

12. Have you ever been a candidate for public office? No. 
13.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years. 

My  records  only  go  back  to  1999.  I  did  not  make  campaign  contributions  of  any 
size when I was with the government. Following is a list of contributions over $500 
made since 1999:

12/07/99 Sarbanes for Senate—$500. 
03/17/00 Clinton for Senate—$1000. 
04/10/00 Clinton for Senate—$1000. 
05/29/00 Townsend for Governor—$1000. 
09/19/00 Levin for Congress—$500. 
09/19/00 DSCC—$1000. 
10/18/00 O’Keefe and Williams for Gov/Lt. Gov—$500. 
04/03/01 Ira Shapiro for Congress—$500. 
05/25/01 Mary Landrieu for Senate—$1000. 
11/15/01 Reno for Governor—$500. 
12/02/01 Shaheen for Senate—$500. 
12/27/01 Abbott for Governor—$500. 
02/13/02 Reich for Governor—$500. 
06/20/02 Herseth for Congress—$500. 
06/30/02 Abbott for Governor—$500. 
07/11/02 Bowles for Senate—$500. 
08/22/02 Abbott for Governor—$500. 
09/29/02 Herseth for Congress—$500. 
10/01/02 Bowles for Sentate—$500. 
01/22/03 Leahy for Senate—$500. 
03/17/03 Daschle for Senate—$1000. 
03/26/03 Tauscher for Congress—$500. 
03/29/03 Kerry for President—$1000. 
05/08/03 Dorgan for Senate—$500. 
05/14/03 Feinstein for Senate—$500. 
05/21/03 Daschle for Senate—$1000. 
06/25/03 McGovern for Congress—$500. 
03/17/04 Clinton for Senate—$1000. 
06/16/04 Markey for Congress—$500. 
06/22/04 Herseth for Congress—$500. 
08/01/04 Mikulski for Senate—$1000. 
09/29/04 Oklahoma Senate race—$500. 
09/30/04 Herseth for Congress—$500.

14. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements.

Coast Guard Distinguished Service medal. 
FAA Distinguished Service medal. 
Mount Marty College Distinguished Alumna.

15.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 
to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed: N/A. 

16.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  nongovernmental  capacity  and  specify  the  subject  matter  of 
each testimony. 

As  Vice  President  for  Public  Policy  for  the  National  Trust  for  Historic  Preserva-
tion,  I  testified  before  the  Interior  Appropriations  Committee  in  support  of  funding 
for historic preservation, Save America’s Treasures and for the National Parks. 

I  also  testified,  in  that  capacity,  before  the  House  Parks  Subcommittee  on  land 

issues in Wyoming. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 

other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers: N/A. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain. 

At  the  request  of  the  Office  of  Government  Ethics,  I  have  agreed  to  resign  from 
all of the Boards listed in question 11, with the exception of the Ignatian Lay Volun-
teer  Corps  Board.  I  was  advised  that  I  could  continue  to  serve  on  that  Board  be-
cause it is affiliated with a religious institution. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated: N/A. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: N/A. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 5 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy. 

As Vice President for Public Policy with the National Trust for Historic Preserva-
tion, we agreed with the Administration when we could on matters affecting preser-
vation  policy  and  funding  and  disagreed  when  we  needed  to.  For  example,  we  did 
not  support  the  Administration’s  position  on  amending  section  4f  of  the  Highway 
bill.  Section  4f  is  the  strongest  and  most  important  historic  preservation  policy  in 
federal law. We were concerned that changes proposed by the Administration would 
gut  these  important  protections.  We  also  advocated  increased  funding  for  Save 
America’s Treasures and for the National Parks. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items: N/A. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-

volved as a party in an administrative agency proceeding or civil litigation? No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere )  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? No. 

5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-

vorable, which you feel should be disclosed in connection with your nomination. 

I don’t believe there is anything additional to report. 
6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 

discrimination on the basis of sex, race, religion or any other basis? No. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes.

The CHAIRMAN. What are your opinions about the relationship of 

the Board to information security? 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  I  did  read  the  IG  report  and  was  very  concerned, 
obviously,  that  there  is  this  ability  to  breach  the  security  system 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

and access sensitive information collected by the Board. I think the 
Board’s  reputation  is  as  strong  as  it  is  because  it  has,  over  the 
years, been able to gather all the facts, and to protect the informa-
tion until the facts lead to the resolution of the investigation. When 
I was at the Labor Department, we put a great priority on improv-
ing the security of our technology systems, and I know it has been 
a priority for OMB, in our Administration, also for this administra-
tion.  I  will  work  with  the  Chairman  and  Vice  Chairman  and  oth-
ers—to make sure that those issues get the attention they deserve. 
It will undermine the credibility of the Board if those issues cannot 
be resolved. 

I  think  there  is  a  corrective  action  plan  that  has  been  proposed. 
In looking at the response to the IG report, I think the agency con-
curs that there are significant problems here. It is unfortunate that 
more  action  has  not  been  taken  to  date,  but  I  am  sure  it  will  be 
a priority. It already is a priority. It will certainly be a priority for 
me. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  apologize  to  everyone  in  the  room  about  the 
heat.  Obviously,  the  person  maintaining  that  heat  is  not  an  Alas-
kan. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. We are a little disturbed about this heat. 
Mr.  Rosenker,  you  know  I  have  had  a  personal  experience  with 
NTSB,  an  accident  that  I  survived,  and  then  also  an  Alaska  Air-
lines plane I was supposed to be on and missed the connection and 
it  crashed.  And  then  my  closest  friend  was  on  the  one  that  turned 
upside down on Alaska Airlines and went into the Pacific Ocean off 
Point Waneemi. 

At  the  time,  I  got  the  impression  that  there  was  sort  of  a  finan-
cial  strain  on  NTSB  in  the  last  investigation.  It  does  take  a  lot  of 
money  quickly  to  gather  up  facts  on  an  investigation  of  tragedies 
such as the one in California. 

Are  you  diverting  money  away  from  the  core  missions  of  inves-
tigating  accidents  and  making  safety  recommendations  to  do  other 
things that the NTSB wants to do right now? 

Mr. ROSENKER. No, sir, I would not agree with that. 
Sir, before I go into further answers, with your permission could 
I  offer  an  opening  statement,  which  perhaps  may  answer  some  of 
the questions that you may have already? 

The CHAIRMAN. A short one, yes. 

STATEMENT  OF  MARK  V.  ROSENKER,  NOMINEE  TO  BE  A
MEMBER  OF  THE  NATIONAL  TRANSPORTATION  SAFETY 
BOARD 
Mr. ROSENKER. Yes, sir I will do that. 
Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  distinguished 
Members  of  our  Committee.  I  am  pleased  and  honored  to  appear 
before you today as you consider confirmation of my nomination as 
a Member of the National Transportation Safety Board for a second 
term. I am grateful to President Bush for this nomination and par-
ticularly  for  his  confidence  in  my  ability  to  continue  to  serve  our 
Nation in this unique and critically important position. 

I  would  also  like  to  thank  Senator  George  Allen  from  my  home 

State of Virginia for his generous and flattering remarks. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

As the Senator also said, my wife is behind me. I also have a lot 
of  friends,  colleagues,  and  former  members  and  current  members 
that are sitting in support of this nomination. 

For nearly 3 years, I have been privileged to serve as a Member, 
Vice  Chairman,  and  most  recently  Acting  Chairman  of  this  small 
but widely known and well-respected federal agency. 

I  have  looked  forward  to  this  confirmation  hearing  since  the  an-
nouncement  of  my  nomination,  not  only  so  that  I  can  answer  your 
questions, but to be able to share with the Committee my pride and 
enthusiasm  for  the  NTSB.  For  nearly  4  decades,  the  NTSB  has 
been  at  the  forefront  of  transportation  safety  issues,  the  protector, 
if  you  will,  of  America’s  vital  transportation  system.  The  Board  is 
not  only  our  Nation’s  premier  accident  investigation  agency,  but 
also  enjoys  a  well-earned  reputation  as  the  most  effective  and  au-
thoritative independent safety body in the world. 

Simply  stated,  sir,  the  men  and  women  who  make  up  the  NTSB 

are the best in the business. 

I  would  also  like  to  recognize  my  fellow  Board  Members,  past 
and present, with whom I have been privileged to serve during my 
tenure  in  office.  All  of  these  men  and  women—Democrat,  Repub-
lican,  and  Independent—have  brought  a  unique  and  valuable  per-
spective to the decisionmaking process that is our responsibility. 

Whether  determining  the  probable  cause  of  an  accident,  recom-
mending  safety  improvements,  or  deciding  on  federal  enforcement 
actions,  we  routinely  joined  together  with  one  objective  in  mind, 
and  that  is  to  raise  the  standard  of  safety  within  our  Nation’s 
transportation community. If confirmed to a second term, I commit 
to  you  and  the  American  people  that  I  will  continue  to  make  deci-
sions and cast votes in that same spirit. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co–Chairman,  distinguished  Members  of  the 
Committee, we all agree that the transportation industry is crucial 
to  our  economy.  The  independent  safety  board’s  primary  and  most 
significant role is to help ensure the public’s confidence in the safe-
ty of this vital sector of our society. 

What  I  have  seen  and  what  I  have  learned  as  a  Member  of  the 
NTSB is that the dedicated men and women who make up our Na-
tion’s  transportation  community,  aviation,  rail,  marine,  highway, 
and pipeline—the management, labor, owners, operators, and man-
ufacturers, are all working closely together to make a safe industry 
even safer. 

I look forward, sir, to answering your questions. 
[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Mr. 

Rosenker follow:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK V. ROSENKER, NOMINEE TO BE A MEMBER OF THE 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Good  morning.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  distinguished  Members  of  the 
Committee.  I  am  pleased  and  honored  to  appear  before  you  today  as  you  consider 
confirmation  of  my  nomination  as  a  Member  of  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board  for  a  second  term.  I  am  grateful  to  President  Bush  for  this  nomination  and 
particularly  for  his  confidence  in  my  ability  to  continue  to  serve  our  Nation  in  this 
unique and critically important position. 

I  would  also  like  to  thank  Senator  George  Allen  from  my  home  State  of  Virginia 

for his kind introduction and support. 

who is here with me this morning. 

With your permission Mr. Chairman, I would like to introduce my wife, Heather, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

For  nearly  three  years,  I  have  been  privileged  to  serve  as  a  Member,  Vice  Chair-
man and most recently Acting Chairman of this small, but widely known and well-
respected federal agency. 

I have looked forward to this confirmation hearing since the announcement of my 
nomination.  Not  only  so  that  I  can  answer  your  questions,  but  also  to  be  able  to 
share  with  the  Committee  my  pride  in  and  enthusiasm  for  the  National  Transpor-
tation  Safety  Board.  For  nearly  four  decades,  the  NTSB  has  been  at  the  forefront 
of transportation safety issues, the protector, if you will, of America’s vital transpor-
tation  system.  The  NTSB  is  not  only  our  Nation’s  premier  accident  investigation 
agency,  but  also  enjoys  a  well-earned  reputation  as  the  most  effective  and  authori-
tative independent safety body in the world. 

Simply  stated,  the  men  and  women  who  make  up  the  NTSB  are  the  ‘‘best  in  the 

I  would  also  like  to  recognize  my  fellow  Board  Members,  past  and  present,  with 
whom I’ve been privileged to serve during my tenure in office. All of these men and 
women—Democrat,  Republican  and  Independent—have  brought  a  unique  and  valu-
able perspective to the decision making process that is our responsibility. 

Whether determining the probable cause of an accident, recommending safety im-
provements, or deciding on federal enforcement actions, we routinely joined together 
with one objective in mind, to raise the standard of safety within our Nation’s trans-
portation community. 

If  confirmed  to  a  second  term,  I  commit  to  you  and  the  American  people  that  I 

business.’’

will continue to make decisions and cast votes in that same spirit. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee,  we 
all  agree  that  the  transportation  industry  is  crucial  to  our  economy,  and  the  inde-
pendent  Safety  Board’s  primary  and  most  significant  role  is  to  help  ensure  the 
public’s confidence in the safety of this vital sector of our society. 

What  I  have  seen  and  learned  as  a  Member  of  the  NTSB,  is  that  the  dedicated 
men  and  women  who  make  up  our  Nation’s  transportation  community—aviation, 
rail, marine, highway and pipeline—the management, labor, owners, operators, and 
manufacturers,  are  all  working  closely  with  us  to  make  a  safe  industry  even  safer. 
I  remain  energized  by  the  unique  opportunity,  if  confirmed,  of  continuing  to  be 
a  part  of  the  strong  and  diverse  leadership  of  this  highly  competent  team  of  safety 
professionals and advocates. I am also very proud of the contributions I have made 
toward  improving  transportation  safety  during  my  tenure  as  a  Member  of  the 
Board. 

I look forward to answering your questions. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 

1.  Name  (Include  any  former  names  or  nicknames  used):  Mark  Victor  Rosenker. 
2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Member,  National  Transportation  Safety  Board. 
3. Date of Nomination: April 4, 2005. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses):

Residence: information not released to the public.
Office: NTSB, 490 L’Enfant Plaza East, SW., Washington, DC 20594.

5. Date and Place of Birth: 12/08/46, Baltimore, MD. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage).

Heather Beldon Rosenker, 
Senior Vice President, 
Fleishman-Hillard Public Relations.
No children.

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended.

Baltimore Community College 1965–1966. 
University of Maryland 1966–1969, BA Communications. 
University of Maryland, University College, Graduate Study 1970–1971. 
Department of Defense Information School, Graduate 1969. 
Air  Command  and  Staff  College,  Extension  Course  Institute,  Graduate,  1983–
1985. 
Air War College, Associate Studies Program, Graduate, 1988–1990.

8. List all management-level jobs held and any nonmanagerial jobs that relate to 

the position for which you are nominated.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

Member, Vice Chairman and Acting Chairman, 
National Transportation Safety Board, March 2003–present.
United States Air Force and Air Force Reserve, Major General, Mobilization As-
sistant  to  the  Commander,  Air  Force  Reserve  Command,  (current  rank  and  as-
signment) June 1969–present.
Department  of  Transportation,  Transportation  Security  Administration,  Pro-
gram Manager, Special Projects Office, November 2002–March 2003.
The White House, Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of the White 
House Military Office, January 2001–November 2002.
United  Network  for  Organ  Sharing  (UNOS),  Assistant  Executive  Director  and 
Managing  Director  of  the  Washington,  D.C.  Office.  November  1999– January 
2001.
Electronic Industries Alliance, aka (Electronic Industries Association) Corporate 
Officer and Vice President, Public Affairs, February 1977–October 1999.
Motorized  Bicycle  Association,  aka  (American  Moped  Association),  Director  of 
Communications, January 1975– January 1976.
Daniel J. Edelman Public Relations, Account Executive, September 1973–Janu-
ary 1975. Represented American Safety Belt Council, Motorcycle Safety Founda-
tion, and the Safety Helmet Council of America.

9. List any advisory, consultative, honorary or other part-time service or positions 
with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, within the 
last five years: None. 

10.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  five 
years.

United  Network  for  Organ  Sharing  (UNOS)—Assistant  Executive  Director  for 
External Affairs and Managing Director, Washington, D.C. office.
Boat Slip Rental Property—50 percent interest; sold January 2002.
Brat  Pack  Investment  Club—20  percent  interest.  Sole  holding  1,295  shares  of 
ADC Telecommunications.

11.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  ten  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap.

Army Navy Club, Washington, D.C.—1999–present. 
Andrews AFB Officers Club, Andrews AFB, MD—1969–present. 
Capitol Hill Club—1973–2000. 
Bryce Resort, Basye, VA—1986–present. 
Military Order of the Carabao—2001–present. 
Aero Club, Board Member—2005–present.

12.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  public  office?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any 
campaign  has  any  outstanding  debt,  the  amount,  and  whether  you  are  personally 
liable for that debt: No. 

13.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years.

2004—Bush-Cheney Campaign—$2,000. 
2000—Darrell Issa for Congress—$500.

14. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements. 

University of Maryland Centennial Distinguished Graduate, 2001; American Bat-
tle  Monuments  Commission  Distinguished  Service  Medal;  USAF  Distinguished 
Service Medal; Legion of Merit, Meritorious Service Medal (1 oak leaf cluster) USAF 
Commendation  Medal;  Department  of  Defense  Achievement  Medal;  USAF  Achieve-
ment Medal (1 oak leaf cluster). 

15.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed. 

All  speeches  that  I  have  given  relevant  to  transportation  safety  may  be  viewed 

on the NTSB website. 

16.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the  subject  matter  of 
each testimony: None. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 

other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers: None. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? No. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated: None. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 5 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy. 

During my appointment as a Member of the NTSB, I have been a strong transpor-
tation safety advocate and on numerous occasions invited to testify before state leg-
islatures, particularly on issues of highway and recreational boating safety. In addi-
tion, the Board has made a significant number of recommendations to federal agen-
cies,  state  and  local  governments,  organizations,  operators  and  manufacturers  con-
cerning  regulations  or  safety  issues  dealing  with  various  modes  of  transportation. 
During  my  career  as  chief  spokesman  for  the  Electronic  Industries  Alliance,  rep-
resenting the U.S. electronics industry, and the United Network for Organ Sharing, 
UNOS, (the national organ transplant network), I have made numerous statements 
and  answered  a  myriad  of  media  queries  on  a  host  of  issues  having  to  do  with  the 
laws, regulations, and policies of those two diverse communities. Some of the major 
issues I spoke out in support of included: NAFTA, Making Permanent the R&D Tax 
Credit, Improvement of Export Controls, Rewrite of Circular A76, privatization and 
outsourcing, federal rules pertaining to Organ Donation and Allocation. My role was 
not that of a registered lobbyist. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items. 

As a senior officer in the Air Force Reserve, if confirmed, I will continue to recuse 
myself  from  any  investigation  involving  an  USAF  aircraft  unless  the  Chairman 
found  my  participation  necessary  and  appropriate.  I  believe  there  are  no  other 
issues that would constitute a conflict of interest. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. 

Detained  in  1965  at  the  age  of  18,  along  with  two  friends,  in  Atlantic  City  NJ, 
malicious mischief, charges dismissed. Detained in 1966 at the age of 19, along with 
one friend, in Baltimore, MD, possession of beer below age of 21, charges dismissed. 
3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain. 

During my employment as an officer of EIA, the Association was involved in rou-
tine  civil  litigation.  I  was  never  a  party,  nor  a  witness  in  any  of  those  proceedings. 
4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere )  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? No. 

5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 

discrimination on the basis of sex, race, religion or any other basis? No. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you.  Now  answer  my  question.  I  am  told 
you are diverting money away from investigating accidents to sup-
port  other  functions.  I  am  told  that  the  training  academy  is  losing 
money  and  that  you  have  cited  budgetary  pressure  for  not  inves-
tigating every fatal accident. Is that true? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Sir, we look at every single general aviation acci-
dent  by  law.  We  take  a  look  at  virtually  every  one  of  the  railroad 
accidents  that  has  some  fatality  or  significant  damage.  In  marine, 
we  look  at  the  major  catastrophic  marine  accidents  as  an  agreed-
to by our Coast Guard MOU. In highway, of course, we cannot look 
at  the  43,000  accidents  that  occur  that  result  in  fatalities.  And  in 
pipeline, we look at every one of the pipeline accidents that occurs 
in a fatality. 

Our  academy  was  created  in  concept  in  the  year  2000,  well  be-
fore  this  Administration  came  to  work  in  this  Board.  Whether  I 
would  have  made  a  decision  to  create  this  academy  or  not  I  think 
is  not  the  issue.  The  issue  is  what  are  we  doing  at  this  academy 
to further the investigation capability of the NTSB and to enhance 
safety in all modes of transportation. 

There  is  a  basic  funding  that  was  created,  I  believe,  as  part  of 
the opportunity to put together the academy, and that was we were 
housing flight TWA 800, which was the 747 that blew up, as it left 
in 1996 on its way from JFK to Paris. That was the most expensive 
accident  that  the  NTSB  has  ever  investigated,  well  over  $40  mil-
lion. As you may recall, back at that time, there was a question of 
really  what  happened.  And  it  took  us  a  good  deal  of  time.  There 
were  two  actual  investigations  going  on  simultaneously:  one  with 
the FBI and one with the NTSB. There was belief at one point that 
it  could  have  been  a  bomb  that  exploded  that  brought  down  that 
747  and  killed  230  passengers.  It  turned  out  that  it  was  not.  It 
turned out that it was a center wing fuel tank explosion. 

The CHAIRMAN. I do not really want a lecture. I want an answer 
to the question. Are you diverting money from your accident funds 
for other purposes? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  The  approximate  budget  is  around  $3.5  million 
to operate the academy. $2.5 million comes from an increase in our 
appropriation  that  was  given  by  Congress  to  support  the  facility 
and  house  the  747  at  the  academy.  There  is  about  $700,000  that 
comes  in  income  from  the  courses.  So  there  is  a  shortfall  of  ap-
proximately  $750,000  to  $800,000  that  must  be  looked  at.  But  we, 
in  fact,  are  teaching  courses  out  there  that  we  have  been  teaching 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

for  years.  The  basic  investigation  course  is  being  taught.  We  were 
teaching that well before there was an academy. 

We are also using that academy for three purposes: one a COOP 
site. We are also renting that COOP site to other federal agencies, 
and  I  would  be  able  to  provide  that  list  to  you.  Second,  housing, 
our regional office in the Ashburn Academy Facility. And third, we 
have  created  an  enhanced  laboratory  capability  that  we  needed 
sorely  that  we  could  not  have  done  in  our  Washington  head-
quarters.  So  part  of  that  shortfall  is,  in  fact,  additional  infrastruc-
ture that we would be needing anyway, sir. 

But  as  far  as  are  we  taking  resources  away  from  our  investiga-

tors, I do not believe we are doing that, sir. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, let me do this. I want to request, on behalf 
of  the  Committee,  that  you  provide  this  Committee  with  updates 
on  your  actions  taken  to  address  the  Inspector  General’s  audits 
every 60 days until that is complete. 

Mr. ROSENKER. Yes, sir, we will do that. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Ms.  Dale,  I  am  sorry  to  have  delayed  to  get  to 
you. I was waiting for the Senator from Texas who wanted to intro-
duce  you,  and  we  just  received  word  that  she  is  on  a  plane  from 
Texas, which was delayed in coming. So I do want to recognize that 
you are here and that we have a series of questions for you. 

As  I  indicated  in  my  opening  statement,  I  was  sort  of  intrigued 
by  the  new  vision  of  the  President  with  regard  to  changes  at 
NASA. Can you tell us really what you see your role will be in that 
process of turning NASA back toward deep space exploration? 

Ms.  DALE.  Yes,  sir.  My  role  will  be  assisting  the  administrator 
on  overall  leadership  policy  direction  and  planning  and  manage-
ment of the agency. 

In  terms  of  the  vision  for  space  exploration,  one  of  the  things 
that  Mike  Griffin  wanted  was  a  complete  skill  set  at  the  top  of 
NASA  within  the  senior  leadership  team.  He  already  has  an  asso-
ciate  administrator  who  has  long-term  agency  experience.  He  him-
self has great technical experience, as you know, in terms of being 
inside the agency and also working long-term in the space commu-
nity, including being the head of In–Q–Tel. He has great leadership 
capabilities.  What  he  was  seeking  in  me  was  agency  management 
experience,  political  and  policymaking  expertise,  as  well  as  a  com-
prehensive knowledge of NASA and the aerospace community. 

So my roles and priorities, as I go into NASA, will be helping to 
implement  the  vision  for  space  exploration,  continuing  on  with 
space  operations,  the  International  Space  Station  and  the  Space 
Shuttle,  and  making  sure  that  there  is  a  healthy  overall  balanced 
program  with  science  and  aeronautics.  And  then  some  of  my  first 
priorities  going  into  the  agency,  if  I  am  confirmed,  would  be  the 
agency’s  financial  management  system  and  also  work  force  issues. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Higgins and Ms. Dale, did you have opening statements? We 
do  not  usually  have  opening  statements  on  nominees,  but  if  you 
have one, we would be glad to listen to them. 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  Senator,  I  did.  You  have  it  for  the  record,  and  I 

think enough has been said. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Ms. Dale? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

Ms. DALE. I do have an opening statement, sir, if you would like. 
The CHAIRMAN. Do you wish to acknowledge anyone present, Ms. 

Higgins? 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  My  daughter-in-law  is  here,  Kate  Higgins,  and  a 
number  of  friends  and  colleagues  I  have  worked  with  over  the 
years. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Dale? 
Ms.  DALE.  My  family  members,  my  significant  other,  Mike 

Fagan, is here, as well as my father, John Dale. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Would you like to read your statement? 
Ms. DALE. If you so desire, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  think  we  would  be  happy  to  listen  to  it,  yes. 
STATEMENT OF SHANA LEIGH DALE, NOMINEE TO BE DEPUTY 

ADMINISTRATOR OF NASA 

Ms. DALE. Mr. Chairman, Co-Chairman Inouye, and Members of 
the Committee, I am honored to be President Bush’s nominee to be 
the  Deputy  Administrator  of  NASA.  I  would  like  to  thank  Mike 
Griffin  for  recommending  me  to  be  his  deputy,  and  I  would  like  to 
thank President Bush for nominating me to this position. I am hon-
ored and excited to be considered to serve at NASA. 

I believe that NASA is entering a period of great promise, excite-
ment,  and  opportunity.  One  key  reason  for  this  is  the  President’s 
Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  a  bold  and  energizing  mission  for 
NASA’s  future.  At  the  same  time,  it  has  been  designed  specifically 
to  be  affordable  and  sustainable,  with  the  resilience  to  survive 
budgetary fluctuations that may occur in the future. This is a crit-
ical  point  because  this  space  exploration  initiative  spans  decades 
into  the  future.  Ultimately  the  quest  is  to  extend  human  explo-
ration across the solar system. 

If  confirmed  as  Deputy  Administrator,  I  am  committed  to  work-
ing  with  Administrator  Griffin,  the  people  of  NASA,  Congress,  the 
White  House,  and  the  private  sector  to  lay  the  foundation  ulti-
mately necessary to achieve the Vision for Space Exploration. 

In particular, I look forward to working with the aerospace work 
force because I understand and value their unique skills and exper-
tise, as well as their contribution to this Nation’s economic competi-
tiveness. 

My written statement goes on to discuss the very important mis-
sions of the International Space Station, the Space Shuttle, science 
and aeronautics, as well as the need for a healthy overall program 
within NASA. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  long  been  a  supporter  of  this  Nation’s 
aerospace  efforts,  and  if  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  being  a  part 
of  the  team  that  leads  NASA  into  the  future.  I  also  look  forward 
to being a very strong advocate for NASA. 

My  professional  background  has  positioned  me  to  provide  a 
unique  fit  with  NASA’s  senior  leadership.  The  breadth  and  the 
depth  of  my  experience  comes  from  working  in  the  executive 
branch,  legislative  branch,  and  academia  for  the  past  15  years.  I 
have  on-the-ground  knowledge  of  the  inner  workings  of  the  White 
House  and  Congress,  and  I  understand  the  complexities  and  chal-
lenges of how agencies interact. This extensive political and policy-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

making expertise will be crucial to successfully navigating the chal-
lenging times that lie ahead for NASA. 

Further,  I  developed  a  comprehensive  knowledge  of  NASA  and 
the aerospace community during my tenure as Staff Director of the 
House  Space  and  Aeronautics  Subcommittee  in  the  1990s.  Legisla-
tive  oversight  of  NASA’s  budget,  policies,  and  programs  provided 
me with an in-depth understanding of and sensitivity for the issues 
facing the agency. 

If  confirmed,  my  fundamental  areas  of  expertise,  combined  with 
the  Administrator’s  technical  expertise  and  leadership  and  the  As-
sociate Administrator’s long-term agency experience, will produce a 
formidable and complete skill set within the senior team that leads 
NASA into the future. 

These  are  exciting  and  challenging  times  at  NASA,  and  I  want 
to help the agency build even stronger relationships with Congress, 
the White House, and the American people. If confirmed, I look for-
ward  to  working  in  an  environment  of  accomplishment  and 
achievement at NASA, a place where significant scientific and tech-
nological  breakthroughs  are  everyday  occurrences.  I  am  excited 
about  the  opportunity  to  become  a  part  of  the  team  at  NASA,  and 
I  look  forward  to  developing  a  very  strong  working  relationship 
with this Committee. 

I  am  honored  to  be  nominated  and  I  thank  you  for  the  oppor-

tunity to appear before you today, sir. Thank you. 

[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Ms. 

Dale follow:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SHANA LEIGH DALE, NOMINEE TO BE DEPUTY 

ADMINISTRATOR OF NASA 

Mr.  Chairman,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  hon-
ored  to  appear  before  you  today  as  President  Bush’s  nominee  to  be  the  Deputy  Ad-
ministrator  of  NASA.  I  would  like  to  thank  Mike  Griffin  for  recommending  me  to 
be his Deputy and I would like to thank President Bush for nominating me for this 
position. 

I believe that NASA is entering a period of great promise, excitement, and oppor-
tunity.  One  key  reason  for  this  is  the  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration—a 
bold and energizing mission for NASA’s future. 

In 2004, the President said ‘‘We have undertaken space travel because the desire 
to  explore  and  understand  is  part  of  our  character.’’  He  went  on  to  say  we  are 
‘‘drawn to the heavens for the same reason we were once drawn into unknown lands 
and across the open sea. We choose to explore space because doing so improves our 
lives, and lifts our national spirit.’’

The  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  is  a  direct  reflection  of  these  funda-
mental  goals  and  desires.  At  the  same  time,  it  has  been  designed  specifically  to  be 
sustainable  and  affordable,  with  the  resilience  to  survive  budgetary  fluctuations 
that  may  occur  in  the  future.  This  is  a  critical  point  because  this  space  exploration 
initiative  will  span  decades  into  the  future.  Ultimately,  the  quest  is  to  extend 
human exploration across the Solar System. 

If confirmed as Deputy Administrator, I am committed to working with Adminis-
trator Griffin, the people of NASA, Congress, the White House, and the private sec-
tor to lay the foundation necessary to ultimately achieve the Vision for Space Explo-
ration. 

When  Americans  think  of  human  space  exploration  today,  they  think  first  of  the 

Space Shuttle and the International Space Station. 

The  Space  Shuttle  has  provided  technological  advances  and  knowledge  that  will 
be  especially  useful  for  the  Exploration  Vision.  Administrator  Griffin  has  described 
the  Space  Shuttle  as  an  amazing  vehicle,  designed  by  this  Nation’s  most  brilliant 
aerospace engineers. 

Over  the  last  five  years,  the  U.S.  and  its  international  partners  have  built  a 
400,000  pound  space  station  in  low  Earth  orbit  which  enables  critically  important 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

research.  The  International  Space  Station  enables  research  on  the  effects  of  space 
on  human  health  that  is  important  for  longer  term  space  travel  beyond  low  Earth 
orbit. 

Another  important  goal  is  achieving  a  balanced  overall  program  of  science,  aero-
nautics, exploration, and space operations. It is my belief that it is possible, and in 
fact,  very  important,  to  maintain  healthy  programs  in  science  and  aeronautics.  As 
Mike  Griffin  has  stated,  even  in  the  Apollo  era  when  the  race  was  on  to  get  to  the 
Moon, NASA was able to execute dozens of science missions and maintain a robust 
program of aeronautics development. 

NASA’s  Science  Directorate  seeks  to  understand  the  origins,  evolution,  and  des-
tiny  of  the  universe  and  to  understand  the  nature  of  the  unique  phenomena  that 
shape it. The Directorate seeks to understand the Sun and Earth, the nature of life 
in  the  universe,  what  kinds  of  life  may  exist  beyond  Earth,  and  the  nature  of  the 
solar system—scientifically and in preparation for human exploration. Scientific dis-
coveries from missions such as the Hubble Space Telescope, Voyager, Aqua, and the 
two Mars rovers further the fundamental missions of NASA and spark the imagina-
tion of people around the world. 

In aeronautics, NASA is currently re-shaping the program to focus in three impor-
tant  areas.  First,  mastery  of  core  competencies  in  subsonic,  supersonic,  and 
hypersonic  flight;  second,  research  in  aviation  safety  that  takes  advantage  of  the 
agency’s  unique  capabilities;  and  third,  partnership  with  the  FAA  and  other  agen-
cies  to  directly  address  the  needs  of  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  Sys-
tem.  NASA  also  is  moving  in  the  direction  of  reinvesting  in  in-house  expertise,  es-
tablishing a program to ensure that essential wind tunnel facilities are maintained, 
and  building  strong  partnerships  with  the  Defense  Department,  industry,  and  aca-
demia. 

Mr. Chairman, I am excited for the opportunity to serve the United States’ space 
program. I have long been a supporter of our Nation’s aerospace efforts and, if con-
firmed,  look  forward  to  becoming  an  advocate  for  NASA  in  the  aerospace  commu-
nity,  within  the  Executive  Branch,  before  the  U.S.  Congress,  and  to  the  American 
public. 

The  breadth  and  the  depth  of  my  experience  for  the  position  of  Deputy  Adminis-
trator come from working in the Legislative branch, the Executive branch, and aca-
demia  for  the  past  15  years.  My  experience  for  this  position  is  in  3  fundamental 
areas:  (1)  agency  management;  (2)  policymaking;  and  (3)  a  comprehensive  knowl-
edge of NASA and the aerospace community.

Let me provide some specifics: 
My  extensive  agency  management  experience  comes  from  my  years  at  the  Office 
of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP).  I  came  to  the  agency  at  a  time  when  it 
had  a  skeleton  staff  and  had  very  few  standard  operating  procedures.  My  task  was 
to  build  the  agency  from  the  ground  up.  I  focused  on  3  key  elements:  recruiting 
skilled  staff,  developing  operating  procedures,  and  creating  trusted  working  rela-
tionships. 

Soon  after  arriving  at  OSTP,  I  developed  a  plan  for  determining  the  critical  skill 
sets  needed  in  the  agency  and  mapping  those  against  existing  expertise.  I  worked 
to  recruit  highly  qualified  scientists  and  engineers  and  senior  staff  for  communica-
tions,  legislative  affairs,  budget,  financial  management,  security  and  human  re-
sources. 

Second,  I  turned  my  attention  to  developing  operating  procedures  for  the  entire 
agency  which  established  an  environment  for  efficient  and  effective  management  of 
day-to-day operations and decision-making processes. 

Third,  consistent  with  the  approach  I  have  taken  throughout  my  public  service, 
I  developed  trusted  working  relationships  within  OSTP,  with  senior  staff  in  other 
offices  of  the  Executive  Office  of  the  President,  and  with  officials  in  the  federal 
agencies, and Congress, the private sector and the international community. 

My  extensive  political  and  policymaking  experience  comes  from  working  for  the 
past  15  years  in  Washington  D.C.  I  have  on-the-ground  experience  with  the  inner 
workings  of  the  White  House  and  Congress,  and  understand  the  complexities  and 
challenges of how agencies interact and how to successfully accomplish program and 
policy objectives. 

While  serving  as  Chief  of  Staff  and  General  Counsel  at  the  Office  of  Science  and 
Technology  Policy,  I  had  the  additional  responsibility  of  leading  the  homeland  and 
national  security  staff.  In  the  early  days  after  9/11,  this  included  leading  and  exe-
cuting homeland security technical operations—a highly unusual function for a pol-
icy  office.  These  political  and  policymaking  skills  will  be  crucial  to  helping  NASA 
successfully navigate the challenging times ahead. 

The  third  element  of  my  experience  for  this  position  is  due  to  my  role  as  Staff 
Director  of  the  House  Space  and  Aeronautics  Subcommittee  in  the  1990s.  During 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

that  tenure,  I  developed  a  comprehensive  knowledge  of  NASA  and  the  aerospace 
community. Legislative oversight of NASA’s budget, policies, and programs provided 
me  an  in-depth  understanding  of,  and  sensitivity  for,  the  issues  facing  the  agency. 
If  confirmed,  my  fundamental  areas  of  expertise  combined  with  the  Administra-
tor’s technical expertise and leadership and the Associate Administrator’s long-term 
agency  experience  will  produce  a  powerful  and  complete  skill  set  within  the  senior 
team to lead NASA into the future. 

These are exciting and challenging times for NASA and I want to help the agency 
build  even  stronger  relationships  with  Congress,  the  White  House,  and  the  Amer-
ican  people.  If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working  in  an  environment  of  accom-
plishment  and  achievement  at  NASA,  a  place  where  significant  scientific  and  tech-
nological  breakthroughs  are  everyday  occurrences.  I  am  honored  to  be  nominated 
and I thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. 

Mr. Chairman, I am happy to answer questions you or the rest of the Committee 

may have. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): Shana Leigh Dale. 
2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Deputy  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics  and 

Space Administration. 

3. Date of Nomination: September 13, 2005. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses):

Residence: information not released to the public. 
Office: New Executive Office Building, Washington, DC 20502.

5. Date and Place of Birth: 9/16/1964, Decatur, GA. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage). Not applicable. 

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended.

1989, JD, California Western School of Law, San Diego, California. 
1986, BS, University of Tulsa, Tulsa, Oklahoma.

8.  List  all  management-level  jobs  held  and  any  non-managerial  jobs  that  relate 

to the position for which you are nominated.

5/2001–present, Office of Science and Technology Policy, Executive Office of the 
President  (General  Counsel,  Chief  of  Staff  and  General  Counsel,  Deputy  Direc-
tor for Homeland and National Security).
3/2000–5/2001, University of Texas System, Assistant Vice Chancellor.
3/1991–3/2000,  Science  Committee,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  (Republican 
Counsel to Science Subcommittee and then Space Subcommittee; Staff Director 
of Space & Aeronautics Subcommittee).

9. List any advisory, consultative, honorary or other part-time service or positions 
with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, within the 
last five years: None. 

10.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  five 
years.

Assistant Vice Chancellor, University of Texas System, 3/2000–5/2001. 
Women in Aerospace, Board Member, 1997–2000.

11.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  ten  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap.

Women in Aerospace, Board Member, 1997–2000. 
Member, California State Bar, 1990–present. 
Member, District of Columbia Bar, 1991–present.

12.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  public  office?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any 
campaign  has  any  outstanding  debt,  the  amount,  and  whether  you  are  personally 
liable for that debt: No. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

13.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years. 7/2004, $2000 Bush-Cheney 2004. 

14. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements.

Merit Scholar, California Western School of Law. 
Outstanding WIA Emeritus Award, Women in Aerospace.

15.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 
to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed.

Articles

1989,  Remote  Sensing  Satellites:  Privacy  and  National  Security  Concerns  Clash 
with  Media’s  Right  of  Free  Speech,  Al  Simon  Center  for  Telecommunications 
Law.

Speeches

1995, Women in Aerospace. 
1998, U.S. Space Foundation, National Space Symposium. 
3/2001, National Academy of Sciences.

16,  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the  subject  matter  of 
each testimony: None. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 
other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers: University 
of Texas Retirement Savings Account. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? No. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated: None known. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 5 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy:  University  of  Texas  System,  Assistant  Vice  Chancellor—tracked  legislation 
that affected the University of Texas System. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 
that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items: Should there be a con-
flict of interest, I would divest that financial interest. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? If so, please explain: Civil law-
suit  filed  in  San  Diego  Small  Claims  Court  in  September  1988  by  David  Ebner  cit-
ing  breach  of  oral  contract  that  he  could  live  in  the  same  apartment  with  me  for 
the summer of 1988. Mr. Ebner dropped the lawsuit. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-

volved as a party in an administrative agency proceeding or civil litigation? No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere )  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? No. 

5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination:  I 
do  not  possess  any  additional  favorable  or  unfavorable  information  to  be  disclosed 
in connection with my nomination. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 

discrimination on the basis of sex, race, religion or any other basis? No. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
I  have  been  called  to  a  leadership  meeting.  The  Co-Chairman 

will complete this hearing. 

Senator INOUYE. [presiding] Thank you very much, Ms. Dale. As 
the  Chairman  indicated,  you  have  been  highly  recommended  by 
Mr. Griffin. 

However,  as  you  are  well  aware,  last  week  GAO  issued  a  report 
citing  that  they  submitted  45  recommendations  to  NASA  in  2003, 
and of that number, 3 have been implemented and I believe 13 par-
tially  implemented.  These  recommendations  are  on  the  improve-
ment  of  financial  management.  What  words  do  you  have  to  share 
with us on that? 

Ms. DALE. Thank you, sir. I am also troubled by the hearing from 
last week and the GAO recommendations on the financial manage-
ment  system  at  NASA.  This  was  an  issue  that  I  dealt  with  when 
I  was  Staff  Director  of  the  House  Space  and  Aeronautics  Sub-
committee  in  the  1990s,  and  unfortunately,  it  is  still  an  issue  that 
challenges NASA today. 

Obviously,  we  are  all  in  need  of  a  sound  financial  management 
system  at  NASA  that  we  can  all  depend  upon,  one  that  provides 
reliable cost estimates and reliable financial management. 

My plan, if confirmed, is to meet immediately with the Chief Fi-
nancial  Officer  to  have  a  discussion  about  the  recommendations 
that have been made by GAO and where the agency is in terms of 
implementing  the  remaining  recommendations  and  what  the  plan 
is for what I understand to be a joint corrective plan to be sent for-
ward from the CFO and the NASA IG. 

I also plan to meet with the Executive Director of the integrated 
financial  management  program  and  CIO  to  have  further  discus-
sions  about  the  enterprise  architecture  and  the  recommendations 
that have been made by GAO. 

These are the immediate steps, as well as meeting with the sen-
ior  advisory  group  that  has  been  established  by  Mike  Griffin.  This 
takes  in  experts  from  other  agencies  that  are  providing  inde-
pendent advice on the financial management system within NASA. 
I also plan to meet with them very soon, if I am confirmed, to gain 
their  understanding  and  their  independent  assessment  of  where 
NASA is in the process. 

My  plan  is  to  have  very  aggressive  oversight  of  where  NASA  is 
with  their  financial  management  system.  This  definitely  needs  to 
be brought under control. I know that there has been progress that 
has been made within the financial management system. I need to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

get  on-the-ground  truth  about  what  is  actually  happening  at  the 
agency. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Of  the  45  recommendations,  16  were  partially 
or fully implemented. That left 29. Were they ignored, the remain-
ing 29? 

Ms.  DALE.  Senator  Inouye,  my  understanding  is  that  the  NASA 
CFO has made statements indicating that she believes other parts 
of  the  recommendations  have  already  been  complied  with.  That  is 
something  that,  if  I  am  confirmed,  I  need  to  find  out  immediately 
upon  entering  the  agency,  where  does  she  think  the  agency  is  in 
terms  of  complying  with  the  recommendations,  looking  over  the 
GAO recommendations, and also having discussions with the senior 
advisory group to see what their take is in terms of an independent 
assessment  of  whether  NASA  is  actually  complying  with  the  re-
maining GAO recommendations. 

Senator INOUYE. Will you share with this Committee the findings 

that you make on these? 

Ms. DALE. Absolutely, sir. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Ms.  Higgins,  you  come  highly  recommended  by 
your  friends.  What  are  your  thoughts  on  the  fact  that  airline  acci-
dents  are  now  being  diminished  as  compared  to  other  accidents, 
rail  and  highways  and  such?  What  should  be  the  core  mission  of 
your organization? Because whenever we hear of NTSB, we hear of 
airlines. 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  Senator,  I  have  been,  obviously,  following  these 
issues  much  more  closely  in  the  last  few  months.  Vice  Chairman 
Rosenker  was  just  up  in  New  York  at  the  significant  accident 
there,  the  boating  accident  on  Lake  George  that  resulted  in  a  tre-
mendous  loss  of  life.  Member  Hersman,  who  is  here,  represented 
the Board at the rail accident in South Carolina, that again, caused 
a significant loss of life. There was a bus accident in Texas recently 
in  the  days  before  hurricane  Rita  that  resulted  in  significant  loss 
of life. So the Board, my sense is, has kept pretty busy even though 
there  have  not  been  a  number  of  aviation  accidents  recently.  And 
while  aviation  I  think  has  the  largest  jurisdiction  because  it  in-
cludes  general  aviation,  as  well  as  all  other  accidents,  clearly  they 
have major responsibilities in all of the other modes as well. 

I do think the staff are stretched pretty thin. I do not know what 
can  be  done  about  that,  but  I  think,  again  from  my  perspective 
having read this RAND report, they anticipated some of these chal-
lenges and suggested that there was a need to look at how to better 
use  resources  and  to  bring  to  bear  outside  resources,  not  just  rely-
ing on the in-house staff for the work that needs to be done. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Your  agency  is  primarily  an  agency  for  inves-

tigation. 

does. 

mission? 

Ms. HIGGINS. Yes. 
Senator INOUYE. In the process, you are bound to find errors that 
were  made.  Do  you  also  make  recommendations  as  to  how  to  im-
prove safety? 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  Yes.  My  understanding  is  the  Board  definitely 

Senator  INOUYE.  Should  that  be  a  more  important  part  of  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

Ms.  HIGGINS.  I  think  not  only  just  making  recommendations, 
Senator.  I  think  it  is  also  making  sure  that  recommendations  are 
implemented.  It  does  not  do  any  good  to  make  recommendations 
that  are  never  followed  through.  In  looking  at  the  recommenda-
tions  currently  unimplemented—as  has  been  mentioned,  I  was  in-
volved  in  the  TWA  800  accident  that  took  place  almost  10  years 
ago.  Next  summer  will  be  the  10th  anniversary  of  that  accident. 
The  most  significant  recommendation  has  not  been  fully  imple-
mented. The FAA is working on it. My understanding is the regula-
tion  is  at  OMB,  but  I  find  it  of  concern  that  10  years  later,  that 
major recommendation has not been fully implemented. 

Runway  incursions  is  another  area  where  there  have  been  rec-
ommendations  made,  again  not  implemented  by  the  FAA  or  not 
fully implemented. 

I know there has been an initiative to try to close out NTSB rec-
ommendations.  The  Board  and  the  members  are  doing  more  to 
work  with  state  and  local  governments  where  they  have  jurisdic-
tion.  So  I  think  there  is  some  of  that  effort  going  on,  but  I  think 
more  needs  to  be  done,  not  just  to  do  the  investigations  and  make 
recommendations,  but  really  to  follow  it  all  the  way  through  until 
the actions are taken. 

Senator  INOUYE.  I  realize  that  with  43,000  highway  fatalities, 
you do not have the time to investigate even 1 percent of them. But 
we  note  that  too  large  a  proportion  of  those  involve  teenagers  and 
it  also  involves  exceeding  speeds.  Do  you  have  any  recommenda-
tions as to what state laws should be? 

Ms. HIGGINS. On speed limits? 
Senator INOUYE. On teenagers. 
Ms.  HIGGINS.  I  have  not  looked  into  that  specifically.  I  have 
raised two teenagers, and they had their share of accidents. Fortu-
nately,  they  were  all  minor.  I  know  that  the  Board  has  looked  at 
the  issue  of  teenagers  and  cell  phones  as  something  that  needs  to 
be  addressed  by  states,  and  I  know  some  states  are  looking  at  the 
whole  issue  of  cell  phone  use.  Seat  belts,  that  is  obviously  a  major 
concern. That is something the Board has paid particular attention 
to. Alcohol as a contributor to accidents. So they have taken initia-
tives in a number of areas. 

I  do  not  know  enough  about  the  work  that  they  have  done  spe-
cifically  focusing  on  young  drivers.  I  think  driver  education  and 
driver preparation is probably another area, and I think the Board 
has done some work there, but certainly more can be done. I think 
the  roads  are  very  dangerous  for  young  people.  There  have  been  a 
number of significant accidents just in this metropolitan area alone 
very recently where young people have lost their lives. So it should 
be of great concern to all of us. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Rosenker,  every  life  is  valuable  whether  it 
is 1 or 1,000, and when you compare the fatality rate on the high-
ways  with  Iraq,  Iraq  seems  to  be  a  very  safe  place.  Do  you  have 
any recommendations? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  Sir,  I  do.  Many,  many  years  ago  I  started  in 
highway safety as one of the advocates for the safety belt use laws 
to  require  safety  belt  use.  I  remember  back  when  we  began  that 
crusade,  it  was  like  talking  about  invading  someone’s  home,  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

yet  35  years  later,  we  now  have  over  82  percent  of  the  American 
people using safety belts. 

When  I  began  in  that  program—as  an  advocate—55,000  people 
were dying on the Nation’s highways with fewer cars being driven. 
So  we  have  made  significant  progress,  but  I  think  more  can  be 
done, sir. 

This  is  a  personal  opinion.  This  is  not  necessarily  a  Board  posi-
tion,  but  I  believe  technology  has  a  tremendous  role  to  play  in  the 
business  of  not  just  mitigating  the  results  of  an  accident,  but  the 
business  of  accident  prevention.  There  are  3  million  injuries  and  6 
million  accidents.  If  we  can  begin  to  include  as  not  just  features, 
if  you  will,  but  requirements  in  our  highways,  as  it  relates  to  cars 
and  trucks,  things  like  electronic  stability  control,  short-range 
automotive  radar,  we  can  begin  the  process  of  reducing,  actually 
preventing the accident from occurring, rather than just mitigating 
the  results  after  the  accident  has  occurred.  Now,  again,  sir,  this  is 
not a Board position. This is just my personal opinion. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Ms.  Higgins,  in  this  war  on  terrorism,  we  re-
quire by law and we mandate that certain things occur, and yet the 
potential for death and destruction on our highways is much great-
er than what terrorism has wrecked upon us. Do you think that we 
should  go  beyond  recommendations  and  just  say  this  is  the  way  it 
is going to be done? 

Ms.  HIGGINS.  This  is  an  area  that  I  need  to  learn  more  about. 
But  I  think  in  our  50  states,  each  state  has  different  speed  limits, 
has  different  requirements  for  issuing  driver’s  licenses.  I  think 
there  have  been  challenges  over  the  years  to  try  to  have  uniform 
standards in those areas. I think, as Chairman Rosenker has said, 
education  can  play  a  significant  role  here,  and  I  think  more  work 
can  be  done  by  the  Board  in  working  with  State  legislators  and 
local  communities  and  various  organizations  to  try  to  implement 
the  practices  that  we  know  save  lives.  Certainly  the  Board  works 
with  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  and  the 
other  modes  in  DOT  to  look  at  safety,  and  this  is  an  area,  if  the 
Committee requests or desires, we can certainly begin to pay more 
attention to. 

The other issue, which is not really the jurisdiction of the Board, 
but  you  can  save  lives  on  the  highways  by  getting  people  out  of 
their  cars  and  into  public  transit.  That  is  something,  again,  that 
is  an  issue  of  resources  and  priorities,  but  I  think  personally  that 
that is an area that deserves greater attention. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
Senator PRYOR.

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Ms.  Dale,  I  would  like  to  talk  to  you  briefly  about  the  EPSCOR 
program.  My  sense  of  EPSCOR  and  other  space  grant  programs  is 
that  these  programs  are  very  beneficial  to  research  institutions.  I 
think  in  the  larger  picture,  they  really  help  America  have  a  com-
petitive  research  base.  I  would  like  to  get  your  thoughts  on  the 
long-term vision for EPSCOR and other educational programs that 
NASA offers. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

Ms.  DALE.  Thank  you,  sir.  I  am  also  supportive  of  EPSCOR.  I 
think it is an important education program that serves historically 
under-represented  geographical  communities  across  the  country.  It 
is  my  understanding  that  NASA  plans  to  continue  to  support 
EPSCOR into the future. 

I  do  not  have  as  much  familiarity  with  EPSCOR  as  I  would  like 
to, and that is something that I would like to have continuing dia-
log,  if  I  am  confirmed,  with  you  and  your  staff,  suggestions  that 
you  may  have,  what  you  think  priorities  are,  and  also  assess,  as 
I  enter  the  agency,  what  the  state  of  EPSCOR  is.  I  am  very  much 
interested in the education programs at NASA. It is something that 
OSTP,  the  office  that  I  come  from,  is  interested  in  throughout  the 
Federal Government, the science and technology programs for edu-
cation—where  they  reside  in  particular  agencies  and  how  effective 
they  are.  So  that  is  something  that  I  will  be  interested  in  as  well. 
Senator PRYOR. Great. I would love for you to keep me posted on 

that as you delve into that. 

Ms. DALE. Yes, sir. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  know  that  oftentimes  NASA’s  headlines  or 
news coverage tend to be dominated by the human space flight pro-
gram, and we understand that. But NASA does many other things, 
and one of the things you have had at NASA, at the agency, is you 
have  had  an  initiative  on  nanotechnology,  which  I  think  is  really 
potentially  very,  very  significant.  I  know  research  institutions  in 
my  state  are  very  focused  on  nanotechnology,  as  they  are  around 
the country, and it really has a very promising future I believe. 

But nonetheless, you do have budget pressures. I know there are 
nanotechnology and many other programs, talking about EPSCOR. 
How  do  you  find  the  appropriate  balance  between  human  space 
flight  and  the  other  very  important  scientific  missions  that  NASA 
has? 

Ms. DALE. Well, I can tell you, sir, that Administrator Griffin has 
expressed  on  many  occasions  his  commitment  to  an  overall  bal-
anced  program  within  NASA.  I  share  that  commitment.  I  believe 
that  it  is  possible  and,  in  fact,  very,  very  important  to  maintain  a 
balance  among  human  space  flight,  the  space  operations  missions, 
and  science  and  aeronautics  within  the  agency.  I  think  Adminis-
trator Griffin’s commitment has been unwavering on that point, to 
make  sure  that  as  the  agency  proceeds  forward  in  the  next  couple 
of  years,  that  that  commitment  to  an  overall  healthy  balance  is 
maintained, and I am committed to that as well, sir. 

Senator PRYOR. Great. 
I  know  that  in  September  NASA  released  its  exploration  archi-
tecture  study  which  includes  a  plan  to  return  to  the  moon  with 
Apollo-style capsules, I believe around the year 2018. The projected 
cost  on  that  will  be  $104  billion.  As  I  understand  the  plan,  NASA 
is going to try to find savings within existing programs in order to 
shift  resources  to  this  return  to  the  moon.  But  as  I  understand  it, 
maybe  one  of  the  areas  of  savings  might  be  with  the  Shuttle  pro-
gram,  but  news  reports  have  indicated  that  over  the  next  5  years, 
the Shuttle will actually need more money, not less, to operate. 

So my question for you is where do you think NASA will look to 

find that $104 billion. 

Ms. DALE. Thank you, sir. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

The  first  important  point  to  emphasize  is  that  the  cost  estimate 
that  you  made  reference  to  is  something  that  is  actually  built  into 
NASA’s  base  budget  over  many,  many  years.  The  Vision  for  Space 
Exploration  is  also  one  that  relies  upon  existing  infrastructure.  It 
is  a  shuttle-derived  system.  So  it  will  be  taking  advantage  of  the 
workforce  that  presently  exists,  a  highly  skilled  and  highly  tech-
nical  workforce,  the  knowledge  base  that  is  resident  with  them, 
and  also  infrastructure  that  will  be  common  to  both  the  Space 
Shuttle and the Vision for Space Exploration. 

It is also important to note that this vision expands decades into 
the  future,  and  it  is  an  important  step  in  terms  of  a  sustainable, 
affordable  approach.  The  approach  is  also  go-as-you-can-afford-to-
pay.  So  it  is  one  that  is  designed  with  the  resilience  to  withstand 
budgetary fluctuations in the future. 

You mentioned cost difficulties associated with the Shuttle. That 
is  definitely  an  ongoing  challenge  within  the  agency,  and  it  is  my 
understanding that NASA is in dialogue with the Office of Manage-
ment and Budget on the challenges of the Space Shuttle budget. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Now, Mr. Rosenker and Ms. Higgins, in Arkansas we had a train 
accident  on  October  15  in  Texarkana,  Arkansas,  which  straddles 
the  line  between  Arkansas  and  Texas.  So  you  are  going  to  have 
four  Senators  who  are  interested  in  this.  It  was  a  Union  Pacific 
train  coming  into  the  station.  Apparently  it  collided  with  another 
Union  Pacific  train  that  was  stationary  on  the  tracks.  There  was 
an  explosion.  It  killed  one  Arkansan,  hospitalized  20  other  people, 
destroyed  two  homes  and  a  rail  bridge,  and  700  people  had  to  be 
evacuated from their homes temporarily due to the release of some 
gas  or  at  least  a  feared  release  of  some  gas.  I  am  very  sorry  that 
happened. 

As  I  understand  it,  you  all  have  that  under  investigation  right 

now? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  Yes,  sir.  We  sent  a  team  down  there  within  8  to 
10  hours  of  the  accident.  Perhaps  it  was  a  bit  longer,  maybe  as 
much as 12. But we did dispatch a team down there, and they are 
beginning right now to analyze what has happened. 
Senator PRYOR. How long do those typically take? 
Mr. ROSENKER. Sir, we are looking at train accidents, depending 
upon  the  complexity  of  it,  anywhere  from  12  to  18  months.  We 
have  one  that  we  are  looking  at  that  we  are  going  to  be  releasing 
in  November  that  occurred  in  Graniteville.  I  believe  it  occurred  in 
January  and  it  will  be  released  at  the  end  of  November.  That  will 
be approximately 10 months. 

Senator PRYOR. Well, 10 months is better than 12 or 18. 
Mr. ROSENKER. Yes, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. I understand about the complexity, but on some-
thing like this where a train just hits another train in the station, 
do  you  think  it  will  be  10  months  or  longer,  or  do  you  have  some 
sense of that? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Sir, I hate to prejudge the amount of time it will 
take. Clearly, we are, at the Board, as frustrated as apparently you 
and  many,  many  people  may  be  at  the  amount  of  time  that  it 
might  take  to  investigate  an  accident.  We  are  looking  at  ways  to 
improve the efficiency of the actual reporting process, and I believe 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

we  will  get  there.  But  we  do  not  wish  to  take  any  shortcuts.  We 
cannot do that if we are going to maintain the methodology and the 
accuracy that we have when we, in fact, make a probable cause de-
termination  and  the  recommendations  which  are  necessary  to  pre-
vent that type of accident from happening again. 

But,  sir,  I  agree  with  you.  We  need  to  do  a  better  job  of  moving 
these  reports  and  making  these  determinations,  and  we  are  work-
ing on that, sir, I guarantee you. 

Senator PRYOR. Is that a manpower issue or is that just the sys-

tem you have in place? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Sir, it is a combination of perhaps both. We have 
14  rail  investigators  to  cover  the  United  States.  Depending  upon 
how  you  would  characterize  incidents  and  accidents,  there  are 
something  close  to  3,000  a  year.  We  look  at  around  15  to  20  of 
them  depending  upon  what  happens  that  year.  Some  of  them  we 
move much faster, as I indicated. The Graniteville accident clearly 
took  top  priority,  given  the  catastrophic  nature  of  that  accident. 
This  one  here,  sir,  we  will  be  looking  at  very  closely,  and  I  will  do 
as much as I can to expedite the result on that. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  like  you  said,  I  want  you  to  be  very  thor-
ough,  but  I  just  appreciate  your  keeping  me  informed  as  that  con-
tinues. 

Mr. ROSENKER. Yes, sir, I will. 
Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, thank you. That is all I have. 
Senator  INOUYE.  I  thank  all  of  you,  Mr.  Rosenker,  Ms.  Higgins, 
Ms. Dale. I have been advised by the Chairman that we will do our 
utmost  to  expedite  your  approval.  In  fact,  if  everything  goes  well, 
we  will  have  a  markup  on  your  nomination  tomorrow,  which  is 
quite  extraordinary.  Otherwise,  you  can  be  assured  that  it  will  be 
done  within  a  week  so  you  will  be  hard  at  work  within  a  week.  I 
thank you all very much and the hearing is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 11 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  I  am  pleased  to  support  the  nomination  of 

Ms. Shana Dale for NASA Deputy Administrator. 

Ms.  Dale  has  distinguished  herself  with  her  unique  combination  of  skills  and  ex-
periences  that  I  believe  will  benefit  NASA.  She  has  provided  leadership  on  impor-
tant issues in the Executive and Legislative branches of Government and Academia. 
I believe that Ms. Dale will complement the technical knowledge of Administrator 
Griffin, and Associate Administrator Rex Geveden’s leadership in Science, Engineer-
ing and Operations, with her comprehensive knowledge of the agency from different 
perspectives  gained  while  serving  in  the  House  Space  and  Aeronautics  Sub-
committee  and  for  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy.  I  offer  my  support 
for  Ms.  Dale’s  nomination  to  be  NASA  Deputy  Administrator,  and  am  hopeful  that 
her confirmation will be swift so that she can get to work helping NASA. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. RALPH M. HALL, U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM TEXAS 
I would like to express my strong support of Shana Dale for the position of Deputy 
Administrator  of  NASA.  I  have  personally  known  Ms.  Dale  for  several  years,  and 
I  worked  closely  with  her  when  she  was  the  staff  director  and  I  was  the  Ranking 
Member  of  the  Science  Committee’s  Space  and  Aeronautics  Subcommittee.  I  have 
always drawn strength and direction from her advice, and I am certain her counsel 
will be equally valuable for NASA’s Administrator, Michael Griffin. 

NASA  is  facing  an  era  of  great  change  and  promise.  As  the  agency  implements 
the  new  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  with  the  goal  of  returning  astronauts  to  the 
Moon  and  pushing  on  to  Mars,  it  needs  proven  leadership  to  work  with  Adminis-
trator  Griffin  to  meet  these  important  ends.  Shana  Dale  understands  the  direction 
of the agency, and has the know-how to get the job done. 

Ms.  Dale  has  a  breadth  of  experience  in  politics  and  policymaking  that  will  help 
complete the top leadership at NASA. With experience in the legislative and execu-
tive  branches  as  well  as  academia,  she  has  an  understanding  of  the  complexities 
and  challenges  of  how  Congress  and  NASA  interact.  She  expressed  to  me  on  more 
than  one  occasion  that  she  understands  the  critical  role  Congress  plays  in  deter-
mining  the  agency’s  priorities,  and  she  emphasized  the  need  for  clear  communica-
tions between NASA and its authorizing and appropriating committees. 

Ms.  Dale  also  brings  a  great  deal  of  managerial  experience  to  NASA.  As  Deputy 
Director  for  Homeland  and  National  Security  for  the  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Policy  in  the  Executive  Office  of  the  President,  she  helped  build  the  agency 
through recruiting skilled staff, developing functional operating procedures, and cre-
ating  viable  working  relationships.  She  is  a  very  capable  manager  who  completed 
agency goals and tasks while staying on budget. 

I  have  listed  just  some  of  the  many  reasons  that  I  fully  and  highly  recommend 
Shana Dale for the position of Deputy Administrator of NASA. I hope that the Sen-
ate finds that she is a qualified candidate and quickly confirms her nomination.

Æ

(31)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:32 Mar 14, 2006 Jkt 026233 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26233.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

